Illinois, session 104th, HB1090.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Section 2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/2)7    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 8mechanics and other workers employed in any public works, as 9hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 10contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 11repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 12whether owned, leased, or rented.13    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 14otherwise:15    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 16demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 17out of public funds. 18    "Public works" as defined herein includes: 19        (1) all projects financed in whole or in part with 20    bonds, grants, loans, or other funds made available by or 21    through the State or any of its political subdivisions, 22    including but not limited to: bonds issued under the 23    Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act (Article 11, Division   HB1090- 2 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1    74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the Industrial 2    Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance Authority 3    Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, or the 4    Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made 5    available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or 6    other funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront 7    Development Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge 8    Redevelopment Zone Act; or funds from the Fund for 9    Illinois' Future under Section 6z-47 of the State Finance 10    Act, funds for school construction under Section 5 of the 11    General Obligation Bond Act, funds authorized under 12    Section 3 of the School Construction Bond Act, funds for 13    school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of the State 14    Finance Act, and funds for transportation purposes under 15    Section 4 of the General Obligation Bond Act; . "Public 16    works" also includes (i)17        (2) all projects financed in whole or in part with 18    funds from the Environmental Protection Agency under the 19    Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which 20    there is no project labor agreement;21        (3) (ii) all work performed pursuant to a public 22    private agreement under the Public Private Agreements for 23    the Illiana Expressway Act or the Public-Private 24    Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act;25        (4) (iii) all projects undertaken under a 26    public-private agreement under the Public-Private   HB1090- 3 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1    Partnerships for Transportation Act or the Department of 2    Natural Resources World Shooting and Recreational Complex 3    Act; 4        (5) and (iv) all transportation facilities undertaken 5    under a design-build contract or a Construction 6    Manager/General Contractor contract under the Innovations 7    for Transportation Infrastructure Act; . "Public works" 8    also includes9        (6) all projects at leased facility property used for 10    airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local Government 11    Facility Lease Act; . "Public works" also includes12        (7) the construction of a new wind power facility by a 13    business designated as a High Impact Business under 14    Section 5.5(a)(3)(E) and the construction of a new 15    utility-scale solar power facility by a business 16    designated as a High Impact Business under Section 17    5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act; . 18    "Public works" also includes19        (8) electric vehicle charging station projects 20    financed pursuant to the Electric Vehicle Act and 21    renewable energy projects required to pay the prevailing 22    wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency Act; . "Public 23    works" also includes24        (9) power washing projects by a public body or paid 25    for wholly or in part out of public funds in which steam or 26    pressurized water, with or without added abrasives or   HB1090- 4 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1    chemicals, is used to remove paint or other coatings, oils 2    or grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface or to 3    prepare a surface for a coating; .4        (10) public utility construction projects, whether or 5    not done under public supervision or direction, or paid 6    for wholly or in part out of public funds, if the project 7    is:8            (A) performed in a public-right-of-way as defined 9        in Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act; and10            (B) performed by a third-party contracted by any 11        public utility described in Section 2.1;12    "Public works" does not include work done directly by any 13public utility company, whether or not done under public 14supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 15public funds. "Public works" also includes construction 16projects performed by a third party contracted by any public 17utility, as described in subsection (a) of Section 2.1, in 18public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the 19Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 20supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 21public funds. "Public works" also includes construction 22projects that exceed 15 aggregate miles of new fiber optic 23cable, performed by a third party contracted by any public 24utility, as described in subsection (b) of Section 2.1, in 25public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the 26Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public   HB1090- 5 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 2public funds. "Public works" also includes3        (11) any corrective action performed pursuant to Title 4    XVI of the Environmental Protection Act for which payment 5    from the Underground Storage Tank Fund is requested; . 6    "Public works" also includes7        (12) all construction projects involving fixtures or 8    permanent attachments affixed to light poles that are 9    owned by a public body, including street light poles, 10    traffic light poles, and other lighting fixtures, whether 11    or not done under public supervision or direction, or paid 12    for wholly or in part out of public funds, unless the 13    project is performed by employees employed directly by the 14    public body; . "Public works" also includes15        (13) work performed subject to the Mechanical 16    Insulation Energy and Safety Assessment Act; and . "Public 17    works" also includes18        (14) the removal, hauling, and transportation of 19    biosolids, lime sludge, and lime residue from a water 20    treatment plant or facility and the disposal of biosolids, 21    lime sludge, and lime residue removed from a water 22    treatment plant or facility at a landfill.23    "Public works" does not include:24        (A) projects undertaken by the owner at an 25    owner-occupied single-family residence or at an 26    owner-occupied unit of a multi-family residence an   HB1090- 6 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1    owner-occupied unit of a multi-family residence; . "Public 2    works" does not include3        (B) work performed for soil and water conservation 4    purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not done under 5    public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out of 6    public funds, done directly by an owner or person who has 7    legal control of those lands; and .8        (C) public utility work done directly by any public 9    utility company, whether or not done under public 10    supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part 11    out of public funds.12    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 13laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 14repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 15whether owned, leased, or rented.16    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 17public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 18available in the county a sufficient number of competent 19skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 20public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 21other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 22is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 23in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 24respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 25Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 26of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be   HB1090- 7 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 2workers may be accessible for work on such construction.3    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 4commission of the State or any political subdivision or 5department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 6in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 7town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 8reclamation improvement or other district and every other 9political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 10whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 11operates under a special charter or not.12    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 13exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 14or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 15    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 16"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 17wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 18annualized fringe benefits for training and apprenticeship 19programs approved by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of 20Apprenticeship and Training, health and welfare, insurance, 21vacations and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 22which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 23work of a similar character on public works.24(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 1-1-22; 102-444, eff. 8-20-21; 25102-673, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1094, eff. 266-15-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 103-346,   HB1090- 8 -LRB104 06090 SPS 16123 b1eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 8-4-23; 2103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)